Washington statutes.
RCW 5.60.020

Who may testify.

Every person of sound mind and discretion, except as hereinafter provided, may be a witness in any action, or proceeding.

[ 1986 c 195 s 1; Code 1881 s 388; 1877 p 85 s 390; 1869 p 103 s 383; 1854 p 186 s 289; RRS s 1210.]